Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2737
Registration in beneficiary form; when.

A security, whether evidenced by certificate or account, is registered in beneficiary form when the registration includes a designation of a beneficiary to take the ownership at the death of the owner or the deaths of all multiple owners.

Laws 1993, LB 250, § 23.